South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S855.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 15-7-30(A)(9) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (9) "Nonresident individual" means a person who is not domiciled in this State, John Doe, or an unknown defendant as provided in Section 38-77-180. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----